Mississippi, session 2026, HB1832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Humphreys County, Mississippi, in its discretion, is authorized to contribute an amount not to exceed Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) during calendar year 2026, out of any available funds of the county, to the Belzoni-Humphreys Development Foundation to promote tourism in the county. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.